Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Chapter 9

Interlocal Cooperation Act

12-9-101. Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Interlocal Cooperation Act.”

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 2; T.C.A., § 12-801.

Cross-References. Agreements with other states concerning medical laboratories, §§68-29-102,68-29-133.

Cooperation between departments of state government, §4-4-112.

Garbage services, cooperation with county, title 5, ch. 19.

Housing of convicted felons by counties, §41-8-106.

Interlocal cooperation, ambulance services, §7-61-104.

Interlocal cooperation, counties with contiguous counties, §5-1-114.

Interlocal cooperation, counties with municipalities, §5-1-113.

Interlocal cooperation, fire fighting, municipalities, title 6, ch. 54, part 6.

Interlocal cooperation, home mortgages, §7-60-217.

Interlocal cooperation, joint building inspectors, municipalities not exceeding 25,000 population, §6-54-116.

Interlocal cooperation on transportation systems, title 7, chapter 56.

Joint educational facilities and services, title 49, ch. 2, part 13.

Joint municipal and county park and recreation systems, §11-21-112.

Municipal police powers, mutual aid agreements, §6-54-307.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. Interlocal agreements under T.C.A. §§12-9-101 et seq., OAG 06-081, 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 90.

Interlocal agreements to provide cable services. OAG 12-15, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (2/15/12).

12-9-102. Purpose.

It is the purpose of this chapter to permit local governmental units the most efficient use of their powers by enabling them to cooperate with other localities on a basis of mutual advantage and thereby provide services and facilities in a manner and pursuant to forms of governmental organization that will accord best with geographic, economic, population, and other factors influencing the needs and development of local communities.

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 1; T.C.A., § 12-802.

12-9-103. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Local government entity” means any city, town, municipality, county, including any county having a metropolitan form of government, local education agency, development district, utility district, human resource agency or other political subdivision of this state;

“Local government joint venture entity” means any entity created pursuant to this chapter, including, but not limited to, a self-insurance pool, trust, joint venture, nonprofit organization, or any other type of organization that is sponsored, owned, operated, or governed by two (2) or more local government entities as a separate and specific activity;

“Public agency” means:

Any political subdivision of this state;

Any private incorporated fire department and industrial fire department not supported by public funds or which are only partially supported by public funds;

Any incorporated rescue squad that is not supported by public funds or that is only partially supported by public funds;

Any agency of the state government or of the United States; and

Any political subdivision of another state; and

“State” means a state of the United States.

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 3; T.C.A., § 12-803; Acts 1983, ch. 45, § 2; 1995, ch. 17, § 1; 2006, ch. 923, § 1.

12-9-104. Interlocal agreements.

Any power or powers, privileges or authority exercised or capable of exercise by a public agency of this state, including those provided in § 6-54-307 or § 68-221-1107(b), may be exercised and enjoyed jointly with any other public agency of this state having the power or powers, privilege or authority, and jointly with any public agency of any other state or the United States to the extent that laws of such other state or of the United States permit such joint exercise or enjoyment. Any agency of the state government when acting jointly with any public agency may exercise and enjoy all of the powers, privileges and authority conferred by this chapter upon a public agency. The authority for joint or cooperative action of political subdivisions shall apply to powers, privileges or authority vested in, funded by, and/or under the control of their governing bodies and relative to which the governing bodies may make other types of contracts. No joint or cooperative agreement shall be entered into affecting or relating to the constitutional or statutory powers, privileges or authority of officers of political subdivisions, or of agencies of political subdivisions with a separate governing board and having powers granted by statute independent of the governing body. Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, any municipality may enter into an agreement with the sheriff, court of general sessions, and the governing body of any county in which it is located to provide for the enforcement of the municipality's ordinances according to §§ 8-8-201(a)(34) and 16-15-501. The agreement between the municipality and the county governing body shall be limited to provide that the cost of such enforcement will be borne by the municipality where the court costs paid over to the county, as provided by § 16-15-501, are not adequate.

Agencies of political subdivisions that have governing boards separate from the governing bodies of the political subdivisions may make agreements for joint or cooperative action with other such agencies and with other public agencies. The power to make joint or cooperative agreements includes any power, privilege or authority exercised or that may be exercised by each of the agencies that is a party to the agreement. Agreements between agencies of political subdivisions that have separate governing boards and other such agencies and agreements between such agencies and public agencies shall substantially conform to the requirements of this chapter. The governing bodies of such political subdivisions shall require agreements made by their agencies pursuant to this chapter to be submitted to the governing body for approval before the agreements take effect.

Any two (2) or more public agencies may enter into agreements with one another for joint or cooperative action pursuant to this chapter. Appropriate action of the governing bodies of the participating public agencies by resolution or otherwise pursuant to law shall be necessary before any such agreement may enter into force.

Any such agreement shall specify the following:

Its duration;

The precise organization, composition and nature of any separate legal or administrative entity or entities created thereby, which may include, but is not limited to, a corporation not-for-profit, together with the powers delegated to such a corporation;

Its purpose or purposes;

The manner of financing the joint or cooperative undertaking and of establishing and maintaining a budget for such undertaking;

The permissible method or methods to be employed in accomplishing the partial or complete termination of the agreement and for disposing of property upon such partial or complete termination; and

Any other necessary and proper matters.

In the event that the agreement does not establish a separate legal entity or entities to conduct the joint or cooperative undertaking, the agreement shall, in addition to the requirements of subdivisions (c)(1)-(6), contain the following:

Provision for an administrator or a joint board responsible for administering the joint or cooperative undertaking. In the case of a joint board, public agencies party to the agreement shall be represented; and

The manner of acquiring, holding and disposing of real and personal property used in the joint or cooperative undertaking.

No agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall relieve any public agency of any obligation or responsibility imposed upon it by law, except that, to the extent of actual and timely performance thereof by a joint board or other legal or administrative entity or entities created by an agreement made hereunder, those performances may be offered in satisfaction of the obligation or responsibility.

Notwithstanding the Local Government Public Obligations Act of 1986, compiled in title 9, chapter 21, including § 9-21-105 and § 9-21-107 to the contrary, a separate legal or administrative entity, created by interlocal agreement between two (2) or more political subdivisions of the state acting pursuant to this chapter, is not empowered to:

Assess, levy, or collect ad valorem taxes;

Issue general obligation bonds; or

Exercise the power of eminent domain.

However, to the extent that the participating political subdivisions possess such powers, the political subdivisions may exercise such powers on behalf and for the benefit of the separate legal or administrative entity.

Financing of joint projects by agreement shall be as provided by law.

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 4; 1973, ch. 88, § 3; 1973, ch. 355, § 3; T.C.A., § 12-804; Acts 1981, ch. 289, § 3; 1982, ch. 930, § 2; 1984, ch. 890, § 1; 1985, ch. 84, §§ 1-4; 1986, ch. 698, § 1; 1990, ch. 921, § 2; 1991, ch. 91, § 1; 1992, ch. 880, § 2; 1993, ch. 401, § 1; 2004, ch. 849, § 2.

Cross-References. Mutual aid agreements, §6-54-307.

Law Reviews.

Eminent Domain — Moving Expense — A Condemnor in Tennessee Is Required to Pay Moving Expense for Fixtures and Chattels Upon Condemnation, 2 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 205.

Attorney General Opinions. General sessions court judge acting as city court judge, OAG 09-0171, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 171 (8/28/98).

County authority to provide crushed stone to entities outside county, OAG 99-058, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 41 (3/10/99).

Several utility districts may establish a corporation as part of an interlocal cooperative agreement for a joint exercise of their powers; whether a district is authorized to support the activities in which the corporation will engage depends on whether its support is necessary or requisite to its authority to own, operate, develop, and maintain a utility district, OAG 03-017, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (2/19/03).

Drug task forces are able to own real property in their own name as long as this is allowed by the particular interlocal agreement establishing the task force, OAG 05-038, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 24 (3/29/05).

Extent of municipal police authority beyond municipal limits. OAG 10-48, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (4/12/10).

Interlocal agreements to provide cable services. OAG 12-15, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 15 (2/15/12).

City’s ability to contract with out-of-state water commission, OAG 14-65, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 66 (6/25/14)

Authority of TWRA Officers to Enforce Local Noise Ordinances on Waters by Agreement with Local Law Enforcement Agency. OAG 15-68, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (9/23/15).

12-9-105. Status of agreements — Parties to actions.

In the event that an agreement entered into pursuant to this chapter is between or among one (1) or more public agencies of this state and one (1) or more public agencies of another state or of the United States, the agreement shall have the status of an interstate compact, but in any case or controversy involving performance or interpretation thereof or liability thereunder, the public agencies party thereto shall be real parties in interest and the state may maintain an action to recoup or otherwise make itself whole for any damages or liability which it may incur by reason of being joined as a party therein. Such action shall be maintainable against any public agency or agencies whose default, failure of performance, or other conduct caused or contributed to the incurring of damage or liability by the state.

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 5; T.C.A., § 12-805; Acts 1984, ch. 890, § 2.

12-9-106. Approval or disapproval.

In the event that an agreement made pursuant to this chapter shall deal in whole or in part with the provision of services or facilities with regard to which an officer or agency of the state government has constitutional or statutory powers of control, the agreement shall, as a condition precedent to its entry into force, be submitted to the state officer or agency having such power of control and shall be approved or disapproved by such state officer or agency as to all matters within such officer's or agency's jurisdiction.

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 6; T.C.A., § 12-806; Acts 1984, ch. 890, § 3.

12-9-107. Appropriations — Furnishing of property, personnel and service.

Any public agency entering into an agreement pursuant to this chapter may appropriate funds and may sell, lease, give, or otherwise supply the administrative joint board or other legal or administrative entity created to operate the joint or cooperative undertaking by providing such personnel or services therefor as may be within its legal power to furnish.

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 7; T.C.A., § 12-807.

12-9-108. Interlocal contracts for performance of services.

Any one (1) or more public agencies may contract with any one (1) or more public agencies to perform any governmental service, activity or undertaking which each public agency entering into the contract is authorized by law to perform; provided, that such contract shall be authorized by the governing body of each party to the contract. Such contract shall set forth fully the purposes, powers, rights, objectives, and responsibilities of the contracting parties. Contracts entered into pursuant to this section need not conform to the requirements set forth in this chapter for contracts for joint undertakings.

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 8; T.C.A., § 12-808; Acts 1984, ch. 890, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Powers of water and wastewater treatment authority outside of its service area. OAG 11-53, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 55 (6/30/11).

City’s ability to contract with out-of-state water commission, OAG 14-65, 2014 Tenn. AG Lexis 66 (6/25/14)

12-9-109. Contracts under other laws unaffected.

Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit any public agency from contracting with other public agencies under existing statutory or charter authority.

Acts 1967, ch. 350, § 9; T.C.A., § 12-809.

12-9-110. Contracts for conveyance of property.

Any one (1) or more public agencies may contract with any one (1) or more public agencies for the conveyance or transfer of property, real or personal, if:

The public agency or agencies receiving the conveyance or transfer utilizes the property for a public purpose; and

The governing body of each public agency that is a party to the contract authorizes such conveyance or transfer and determines that the terms and conditions set forth are appropriate.

Any public agency utilizing the authority of this section shall not be required to declare such property surplus prior to the conveyance or transfer, and shall also be exempt from contrary requirements in any budget or purchasing act, public or private.

Acts 2005, ch. 336, § 1.

12-9-111. Filing of interlocal agreements forming local government joint venture.

Any interlocal agreement entered into by local government entities that creates a local government joint venture entity shall be filed in the office of the comptroller of the treasury within ninety (90) days of execution of the agreement. Any interlocal agreement entered into by local government entities of this state that created a local government joint venture entity that is in effect on June 20, 2006, shall be filed with the office of the comptroller of the treasury within one hundred twenty (120) days of June 20, 2006.

Acts 2006, ch. 923, § 2.

12-9-112. Annual statement on interlocal agreements that create local government joint venture entity.

Any local government joint venture entity shall, during the term of the agreement, file an annual statement with the office of the comptroller of the treasury. The statement shall set forth the names of all parties to the agreement, the annual revenue and expenses of any entity created under the agreement and the other information required by the comptroller.

The comptroller of the treasury may develop guidelines in furtherance of the administration of this section.

Acts 2006, ch. 923, § 2; 2007, ch. 207, § 1.